Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1837
Commission; contract for services.

(1) The commission is hereby authorized to contract for professional services and expert assistance, including, but not limited to, the services of engineers, accountants, attorneys, and economists, to assist in investigations and appraisals.

(2) Such contracts shall be negotiated by the chairperson of the commission, the executive director, or the designee of the executive director. The commission shall consider all proposals by persons applying to perform such contracts and shall award the contracts.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 37.